Hawaii statutes.
§445-115 Same; consent of owner. It
shall be unlawful for any person, except a public officer or employee in
performance of a public duty, or a private person in giving legal notice, to
paste, post, paint, print, nail, or tack or otherwise fasten any card, banner,
handbill, sign, poster, outdoor advertising device, or notice of any kind upon
any property without the oral or written consent of the owner, holder, lessee,
agent, or trustee thereof. [L 1965, c 233, pt of §1; Supp, §155-124; HRS
§445-115]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next